Utah statutes.
53A-25b-202.   Authority and duties of the superintendent.
The superintendent shall:
(1)  serve as the chief executive officer of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and
the Blind;
(2)  subject to the approval of the board, appoint an associate superintendent
to administer the Utah School for the Deaf based on:
(a)  demonstrated competency as an expert educator of deaf persons; and
(b)  knowledge of school management and the instruction of deaf persons;
(3)  subject to the approval of the board, appoint an associate superintendent
to administer the Utah School for the Blind based on:
(a)  demonstrated competency as an expert educator of blind persons; and
(b)  knowledge of school management and the instruction of blind persons,
including an understanding of the unique needs and education of deafblind
persons;
(4)  establish policies for student conduct and procedures for due process,
consistent with federal and state statutes;
(5)  establish policies and procedures for reporting child abuse in accordance
with Section 62A-4a-403; and
(6)  establish procedures to ensure effective communication and relationships
with school districts, charter schools, other state agencies, and the
community.
